Washington statutes.
RCW 16.10.040

Dog control zones—Regulations—License fees, collection, disposition.

The county commissioners shall by ordinance promulgate the regulations to be enforced within a dog control zone. These shall include provisions for the control of unlicensed dogs and the establishment of license fees. The county sheriff and/or other agencies designated by the county commissioners shall be responsible for the enforcement of the act, including the collection of license fees. Fees collected shall be transferred to the current expense fund of each county.

[ 1969 c 72 s 4.]